District of Columbia statutes.
31-3302.08

Applicability.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the provisions of this subchapter shall apply to individual health benefit plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 1998.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 208, 45 DCR 8433
1981 Ed., § 35-1029.

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.

See notes to § 31-3301.01.